GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST/src/tok-abbr.xfst
# ============================================================================
# CONTENT:	(x)fst script for abbreviation to be included in tokenizer FST
#
# LANGUAGE:	PORTUGUESE
# CHARENCODING: UTF-8
#
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller
#
# CREATED:	06-Aug-2001	AS: converted form older scripts by Caroline Hagege
#
# UPDATED:	14-Mar-2005	AS: regrouped files
# UPDATED:	03-Aug-2006	AS: converted to UTF-8
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -utf8 -l [Thisfile]
# ============================================================================

define LIST [
  {abr.}
| {arq.}
| {ago.}
| {art.}
| {artº.}
| {Av.}
| {ca.}
| {cf.}
| {dec.}
| {dr.}
| {dra.}
| {e.g.}
| {ed.}
| {eng.}
| {etc.}
| {Ex.}
| {Exa.}
| {fev.}
| {hs.}
| {i.é.}
| {jan.}
| {jr.}
| {jul.}
| {jun.}
| {lda.}
| {mai.}
| {Mr.}
| {mr.}
| {Mrs.}
| {nº.}
| {nov.}
| {out.}
| {p.ex.}
| {pag.}
| {pg.}
| {prof.}
| {pág.}
| {Ph.D.}
| {S.}
| {S.A.}
| {sec.}
| {set.}
| {sr.}
| {sra.}
| {srs.}
| {séc.}
| {tel.}
| {telef.}
| {ult.}
| {V.Ex.}
| {V.Exa.}
| {vol.}
| {Corp.}
| {Inc.}
| {Ltda.}
| {Co.}
];

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> regular abbreviations (Latin-1)

define Letter [
  A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z
| a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z
| Á|Â|Ã|Ä|Æ|Ç|È|Ï|Ð|É|Ê|Ë|Ì|Í|Î|Å|£|¥|Ñ|Ò|Ó|Ô|Õ|Ö|À|Ø|Þ|Ù|Ú|Û|Ü|Ý
| á|â|ã|ä|æ|ç|è|ï|ð|é|ê|ë|ì|í|î|µ|å|ñ|ò|ó|ô|õ|ö|à|ø|þ|ù|ú|û|ü|ý
] ;

define InitName [ {Chr} | {Th} ] ;

define INIT  [ [Letter|InitName] %. ]+ ;

# ---------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> numerals ending with "."

define Dig      [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] ;

define NUM	Dig+ %º %. ;

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> initial upper case
define CAP [
     a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F,
     g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L,
     m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R,
     s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X,
     y (->) Y, z (->) Z, 
     à (->) [A|a]         || .#. _ 
] ;

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> combine
read regex [
    [ LIST .o. CAP ].l
|   INIT
|   NUM
];
